Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 5. Transferees and Creditors of Partner.

§79-13-501.
Partner not co-owner of partnership property.

A partner is not a co-owner of partnership property and has no interest in partnership property which can be transferred, either voluntarily or involuntarily.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 501, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

Where creditor sold farm supplies to partnership in which debtor was general partner, creditor was not entitled to administrative expense claim because partnership was separate legal entity and parties stipulated that farm supplies were delivered to partnership, and not to either general partner. In re Spencer, — B.R. —, 2016 Bankr. LEXIS 3867 (Bankr. N.D. Miss. Nov. 1, 2016).

§79-13-502.
Partner’s transferable interest in partnership.

Except as provided in Article 9 of this chapter or the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act, the only transferable interest of a partner in the partnership is the partner’s share of the profits and losses of the partnership and the partner’s right to receive distributions.The interest of a partner, whether or not transferable, is personal property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 502; Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 39, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, inserted the exception to the first sentence and “of a partner, whether or not transferable,” in the middle of the last sentence.

Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act, see § 79-37-101 et seq

§79-13-503.
Transfer of partner’s transferable interest.

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a partner’s transferable interest in the partnership:

Is permissible;

Does not by itself cause the partner’s dissociation or a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business; and

Does not, as against the other partners or the partnership, entitle the transferee, during the continuance of the partnership, to participate in the management or conduct of the partnership business, to require access to information concerning partnership transactions, or to inspect or copy the partnership books or records.

A transferee of a partner’s transferable interest in the partnership has a right:

To receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled;

To receive upon the dissolution and winding up of the partnership business, in accordance with the transfer, the net amount otherwise distributable to the transferor; and

To seek under Section 79-13-801(6) a judicial determination that it is equitable to wind up the partnership business.

In a dissolution and winding up, a transferee is entitled to an account of partnership transactions only from the date of the latest account agreed to by all of the partners.

Upon transfer, the transferor retains the rights and duties of a partner other than the interest in distributions transferred.

A partnership need not give effect to a transferee’s rights under this section until it has notice of the transfer.

A transfer of a partner’s transferable interest in the partnership in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the partnership agreement is ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 503, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-504.
Partner’s transferable interest subject to charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a partner or of a partner’s transferee, a court having jurisdiction may charge the transferable interest of the judgment debtor to satisfy the judgment. The court may appoint a receiver of the share of the distributions due or to become due to the judgment debtor in respect of the partnership and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries the judgment debtor might have made or which the circumstances of the case may require.

A charging order constitutes a lien on the judgment debtor’s transferable interest in the partnership. The court may order a foreclosure of the interest subject to the charging order at any time. The purchaser at the foreclosure sale has the rights of a transferee.

At any time before foreclosure, an interest charged may be redeemed:

By the judgment debtor;

With property other than partnership property, by one or more of the other partners; or

With partnership property, by one or more of the other partners with the consent of all of the partners whose interests are not so charged.

This chapter does not deprive a partner of a right under exemption laws with respect to the partner’s interest in the partnership.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a judgment creditor of a partner or partner’s transferee may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s transferable interest in the partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 504, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-505.
Enforceability of limitations on assignments of partnership interests.

Sections 75-9-406 and 75-9-408 do not apply to a partnership interest in a partnership formed under the laws of Mississippi, including the rights, powers and interests arising under a certificate of partnership or partnership agreement or under this chapter.To the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between this section and Sections 75-9-406 and 75-9-408, this section prevails.It is the express intent of this section to permit the enforcement, as a contract among the partners of a partnership, of any provision of a partnership agreement that would otherwise be ineffective under Sections 75-9-406 and 75-9-408.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 506, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2010.